Illinois, session 104th, HB1197.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Children and Family Services Act is amended 5by changing Section 1.1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 505/1.1)  (from Ch. 23, par. 5001.1)7    Sec. 1.1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as 8the Children and Family Services Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-820.)